West Virginia, session 2026, HB4836.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 20. dogs and cats. §19-20-27.  Prohibition against taking a dog, cat, or other animal that is not registered as a service animal into grocery stores or retail store that sells food; penalty. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, no person shall enter a grocery store or retail establishment that sells food with a dog, cat, or other animal unless the animal is a service animal.(b) A person that violates this section of code shall be subject to a fine of not more than $500. Upon a second or subsequent violation, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.